New Jersey, session 221, S3267.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established a Textbook Grant Program for State Interns. It shall be the duty of the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority to administer the program.  The authority shall, upon successful review of an application, disburse a one-time grant in the amount of $500 to the applicant.  The grant shall be applied by the applicant towards the cost of textbooks and other course materials needed by the applicant in the succeeding semester. To be eligible for a grant under the program, a student shall apply to the authority and submit such documentation as the authority shall require to support the students: (1)   completion of an unpaid short-term internship at a State entity; and (2)   enrollment in good standing in an undergraduate degree program at an institution of higher education in the State at the time of the application, including a statement from the student indicating the students intention to continue enrollment in the succeeding semester. b.    As used in this section: "State" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.